Hawaii statutes.
§122A-5 Uniform; rank precedence and
command. (a) The Hawaii state defense force shall be uniformed. The
governor shall prescribe by rules a distinctive uniform and insignia of the
Hawaii state defense force.

(b) Grades and ranks shall exist in the Hawaii
state defense force and shall be the same as those prescribed by federal law
and regulations to exist in the army national guard. Members of the Hawaii
state defense force in the same grade shall rank among themselves in the same
manner as is prescribed by federal law and regulations for members of the army
national guard in like grade.

(c) The senior officer present in any
organization or formation of the Hawaii state defense force shall command,
unless the governor shall designate another commanding officer. When in the
active service of the State, an officer of the national guard assigned to any
organization or formation of the Hawaii state defense force is eligible to
command that organization or formation, but an officer of the Hawaii state defense
force is not eligible to command an organization or formation of the national
guard. [L 1987, c 35, pt of §1; am L 1988, c 135, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next